Indiana, session 2026, SB25.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-11-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. (a) The device named and list of nominees
shall be placed on the ballots as follows:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election in the first column or row on the left side of all ballots.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the
last election in the second column or row.
(3) Any other political party in the same order.
(b) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of state
in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate (or an
independent ticket for President and Vice President of the United
States or for governor and lieutenant governor), the party or
independent candidate or ticket shall be placed on the ballot after the
parties described in subsection (a). If more than one (1) political party
or independent candidate or ticket that has qualified to be on the ballot
did not have a candidate for secretary of state in the last election, those
parties, candidates, or tickets shall be listed on the ballot in the order
in which the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(c) Subject to subsection (e), a column or row for write-in voting
SEA 25

2
shall be placed to the right of all party and independent columns on the
ballot.
(d) This subsection applies to a county having a population of more
than four hundred thousand (400,000) and less than seven hundred
thousand (700,000). If there is insufficient room on a row to list each
candidate of a political party, a second or subsequent row may be
utilized. However, a second or subsequent row may not be utilized
unless the first row, and all preceding rows, have been filled.
(e) A column or row for write-in voting for an office is not required
if there are no declared write-in candidates for that office. However,
procedures must be implemented to permit write-in voting for
candidates for federal offices.
(f) This subsection applies to candidates who appear on the
ballot for a school board office. The names of the candidates for
each office must be grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state at
the last election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the
second highest number of votes in the county for secretary of
state is listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the
parties' candidates for secretary of state finished in the last
election are listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary
of state in the last election or a nominee is an independent
candidate, the party or candidate is listed after the parties
described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent
candidate qualifies to be on the ballot, the parties, candidates,
or tickets are listed in the order in which the party filed its
petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C) is placed after the candidates listed in
subdivisions (1) through (5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates
listed in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
If there is more than one (1) candidate for a grouping described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) for a school board office, the
candidates shall appear in the order established by this subsection
SEA 25

3
and within the grouping, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
SECTION 2. IC 3-11-13-11, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) The ballot information, whether placed
on the ballot card or on the marking device, must be in the order of
arrangement provided for ballots under this section.
(b) Each county election board shall have the names of all
candidates for all elected offices, political party offices, and public
questions printed on a ballot card as provided in this chapter. The
county may:
(1) print all offices and questions on a single ballot card; and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot card must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners shall be listed on the ballot with the name and device set
forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the device
may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the device.
IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not include a
name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2) or more
parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The offices and public questions on the general election ballot
must be placed on the ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). The offices and
public questions may be listed in a continuous column either vertically
or horizontally and on a number of separate pages.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
SEA 25

4
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for. A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
If there is more than one (1) candidate for a grouping described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) for a school board office, the
candidates shall appear in the order established by this subsection
and within the grouping, in alphabetical order according to
SEA 25

5
surname.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent" if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in a uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The following information must be placed at the top of the ballot
before the first public question is listed:
(1) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7.
(2) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d),
and IC 3-11-2-10(e).
SEA 25

6
(l) The ballot must include a single connectable arrow, circle, oval,
or square, or a voting position for voting a straight party ticket by one
(1) mark as required by section 14 of this chapter, and the single
connectable arrow, circle, oval, or square, or the voting position for
casting a straight party ticket ballot must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each political party must be of uniform size
and type and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for
listing candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, do not make a mark in this section and proceed to voting
the ballot by office.".
(m) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a single connectable
arrow, a circle, or an oval may be used instead of a square. Except as
expressly authorized or required by statute, a county election board
may not print a ballot card that contains language concerning the public
question other than the language authorized by a statute.
(n) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to optical scan ballots.
(o) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title or
contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
(p) This subsection applies to an optical scan ballot that does not
list:
(1) the names of political parties or candidates; or
(2) the text of public questions;
on the face of the ballot. The ballot must be prepared in accordance
with this section, except that the ballot must include a numbered circle
or oval to refer to each political party, candidate, or public question.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-14-3.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Each county election board shall have
SEA 25

7
the names of all candidates for all elected offices, political party
offices, and public questions printed on ballot labels for use in an
electronic voting system as provided in this chapter.
(b) The county may:
(1) print all offices and public questions on a single ballot label;
and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot label is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot label must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners must be listed on the ballot label with the name and device
set forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the
device may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the
device. IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not
include a name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2)
or more parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The ballot labels must list the offices and public questions on the
general election ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). Each office and
public question may have a separate screen, or the offices and public
questions may be listed in a continuous column either vertically or
horizontally.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for. A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
SEA 25

8
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law. A space for
write-in voting for an office is not required if there are no
declared write-in candidates for that office. However, procedures
must be implemented to permit write-in voting for candidates for
federal offices.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
If there is more than one (1) candidate for a grouping described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) for a school board office, the
candidates shall appear in the order established by this subsection
and within the grouping, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
SEA 25

9
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent", if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the party order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7 must be
placed at the top or beginning of the ballot label before the first public
question is listed.
(l) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d), and
IC 3-11-2-10(e) may be:
(1) placed on the ballot label; or
(2) posted in a location within the voting booth that permits the
SEA 25

10
voter to easily read the instructions.
(m) Except as provided in section 14.5 of this chapter, the ballot
label must include a touch sensitive point or button for voting a straight
political party ticket by one (1) touch, and the touch sensitive point or
button must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each party must be of uniform size and type,
and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for listing
candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, press "NEXT" (or replace "NEXT" with the term used by
that voting system to permit a voter to skip a ballot screen) to continue
voting.".
(n) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a touch sensitive
point or button must be used instead of a square. Except as expressly
authorized or required by statute, a county election board may not print
a ballot label that contains language concerning the public question
other than the language authorized by a statute.
(o) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to ballots for electronic
voting systems.
(p) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot label does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title
or contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
SEA 25

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 25